Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 20. Southwest Virginia Public Education Consortium.

§ 22.1-350.
Southwest Virginia Public Education Consortium created; region defined; governing board.

The Southwest Virginia Public Education Consortium is hereby established and shall be referred to in this chapter as the Consortium. For the purposes of this chapter and the work of the Consortium, “Southwest Virginia” shall include the Counties of Bland, Buchanan, Carroll, Dickenson, Grayson, Lee, Russell, Scott, Smyth, Tazewell, Washington, Wise, and Wythe, and the Cities of Bristol, Galax, and Norton. The governing board of the Consortium shall consist of the school superintendents of the named localities; the chancellor or his designee of the University of Virginia’s College at Wise; the presidents or their designees of Emory and Henry College, Virginia Intermont College, Bluefield College, Mountain Empire Community College, Virginia Highlands Community College, Southwest Virginia Community College, and Wytheville Community College; and the Director of the Southwest Virginia Higher Education Center. The region’s legislators shall serve as nonvoting, advisory members of the board.

Members of the board shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in the work of the Consortium, except that legislative members shall be reimbursed pursuant to § 30-19.16. The board shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman from among its members.

History.

1992, c. 785; 1994, c. 276; 1999, cc. 424, 437.

Editor’s note.

Section 30-19.16, referred to in subsection B, was repealed by Acts 1999, c. 930.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 424 and 437 are identical, and substituted “the University of Virginia’s College at Wise” for “Clinch Valley College” in subsection A; and substituted “§ 30-19.16” for “§ 14.1-19.1” in subsection B.

§ 22.1-351.
Functions and duties.

The Consortium shall perform the following functions and duties:

Coordinate with those educational institutions and agencies in the Commonwealth and surrounding areas to develop joint educational initiatives;

Promote and establish, in conjunction with the Department of Education and the region’s public school divisions, regional programs to address area educational needs;

Coordinate the development and sharing of programs, educational techniques, and resources among and between the region’s school divisions and institutions of higher education to enhance the educational opportunities for students and teachers in Southwest Virginia; and

Provide technical assistance to school divisions throughout the Commonwealth for the implementation of effective educational programs.

History.

1992, c. 785.

§ 22.1-352.
Executive director; staff support; location.

From such funds as may be appropriated or received, the board of the Consortium may appoint an executive director, who shall be authorized to employ such staff as necessary to enable the Consortium to perform its duties as set forth in this chapter. The board is authorized to determine the duties of such staff and to fix salaries and compensation from such funds as may be appropriated or received. The Consortium’s offices shall be housed at the University of Virginia’s College at Wise.

History.

1992, c. 785; 1999, cc. 424, 437.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 424 and 437 are identical, and substituted “the University of Virginia’s College at Wise” for “Clinch Valley College.”

§ 22.1-353.
Application for and acceptance of gifts and grants.

The Consortium is authorized to apply for, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from public or private sources to enable it to carry out its objectives.

History.

1992, c. 785.

§ 22.1-354.
Cooperation of other agencies.

All agencies of the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the Consortium and, upon request, assist the Consortium in the performance of its duties and responsibilities.

History.

1992, c. 785.